Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.06, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6a. new text end new text begin Roundabout. new text end new text begin (a) A road authority, as defined in section 169.224, subdivision 1, must not establish a crosswalk within 100 feet of a roundabout. new text end new text begin (b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to a crosswalk that is: new text end new text begin (1) controlled by pedestrian-control signals; or new text end new text begin (2) established prior to the effective date of this section, until reconstruction of the roundabout or road. new text end